Washington statutes.
RCW 15.21.030

Cost.

Cost for the purpose of this chapter, shall be that price paid for fresh fruit by the seller or the actual replacement cost for such fresh fruit: PROVIDED, That the delivered invoice price to such seller shall be prima facie evidence of the price paid for such fresh fruit by the seller.

[ 1965 c 61 s 3.]